Utah statutes.
17C-1-412.   Use of funds allocated for housing -- Separate accounting
required -- Issuance of bonds for housing -- Action to compel agency to
provide housing funds.
(1) (a)  Each agency shall use all funds allocated for housing under this
section to:
(i)  pay part or all of the cost of land or construction of income targeted
housing within the boundary of the agency, if practicable in a mixed income
development or area;
(ii)  pay part or all of the cost of rehabilitation of income targeted housing
within the boundary of the agency;
(iii)  lend, grant, or contribute money to a person, public entity, housing
authority, private entity or business, or nonprofit corporation for income
targeted housing within the boundary of the agency;
(iv)  plan or otherwise promote income targeted housing within the boundary of
the agency;
(v)  pay part or all of the cost of land or installation, construction, or
rehabilitation of any building, facility, structure, or other housing
improvement, including infrastructure improvements, related to housing located
in a project area where blight has been found to exist;
(vi)  replace housing units lost as a result of the urban renewal, economic
development, or community development;
(vii)  make payments on or establish a reserve fund for bonds:
(A)  issued by the agency, the community, or the housing authority that
provides income targeted housing within the community; and
(B)  all or part of the proceeds of which are used within the community for
the purposes stated in Subsection (1)(a)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), (v), or (vi);
(viii)  if the community's fair share ratio at the time of the first adoption
of the project area budget is at least 1.1 to 1.0, make payments on bonds:
(A)  that were previously issued by the agency, the community, or the housing
authority that provides income targeted housing within the community; and
(B)  all or part of the proceeds of which were used within the community for
the purposes stated in Subsection (1)(a)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), (v), or (vi);
or
(ix)  relocate mobile home park residents displaced by an urban renewal,
economic development, or community development project.
(b)  As an alternative to the requirements of Subsection (1)(a), an agency may
pay all or any portion of housing funds to:
(i)  the community for use as provided under Subsection (1)(a);
(ii)  the housing authority that provides income targeted housing within the
community for use in providing income targeted housing within the community;
or
(iii)  the Olene Walker Housing Loan Fund, established under Title 9, Chapter
4, Part 7, Olene Walker Housing Loan Fund, for use in providing income
targeted housing within the community.
(2)  The agency or community shall separately account for the housing funds,
together with all interest earned by the housing funds and all payments or
repayments for loans, advances, or grants from the housing funds.
(3)  An agency may:
(a)  issue bonds from time to time to finance a housing undertaking under this
section, including the payment of principal and interest upon advances for
surveys and plans or preliminary loans; and
(b)  issue refunding bonds for the payment or retirement of bonds under
Subsection (3)(a) previously issued by the agency.
(4) (a)  If an agency fails to provide housing funds in accordance with the
project area budget and, if applicable, the housing plan adopted under
Subsection 17C-2-204(2), the loan fund board may bring legal action to compel
the agency to provide the housing funds.
(b)  In an action under Subsection (4)(a), the court:
(i)  shall award the loan fund board a reasonable attorney fee, unless the
court finds that the action was frivolous; and
(ii)  may not award the agency its attorney fees, unless the court finds that
the action was frivolous.
